New York, session 2025-2026, S5635.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "fertility 2 protection act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 365-a of the social services law is 4 amended by adding a new paragraph (nn) to read as follows: 5 (nn) standard fertility preservation services when a medical treatment 6 may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility to a recipient. 7 For the purposes of this paragraph, "iatrogenic infertility" means an 8 impairment of fertility by surgery, radiation, chemotherapy or other 9 medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or processes. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04169-01-5